North Dakota statutes. TITLE 53 Sports and Amusements
CHAPTER 53-06.1 Games of Chance

53-06.1-01.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Adjusted gross proceeds” means gross proceeds less cash prizes, cost of merchandise prizes, gaming tax, and federal excise tax imposed under section 4401 of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. 4401].

“Charitable organization” means an organization whose primary purpose is for relief of poor, distressed, underprivileged, diseased, elderly, or abused persons, prevention of cruelty to children or animals, or similar condition of public concern.

“Civic and service organization” means an organization whose primary purpose is to promote the common good and social welfare of a community as a sertoma, lion, rotary, jaycee, kiwanis, or similar organization.

“Closely related organization” means an organization that controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another organization. Control exists when an organization has the authority or ability to elect, appoint, or remove a majority of the officers or directors of another organization or, by policy, contract, or otherwise, has the authority or ability to directly or indirectly direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of another organization.

“Distributor” means a person that sells, markets, or distributes equipment designed for use in the conduct of games.

“Educational organization” means a nonprofit public or private elementary or secondary school, two-year or four-year college, or university.

“Electronic pull tab device” means a device, approved by the attorney general, which electronically displays pull tabs.

“Eligible organization” means a veterans, charitable, educational, religious, fraternal, civic and service, public safety, or public-spirited organization domiciled in North Dakota or authorized by the secretary of state as a foreign corporation under chapter 10-33, incorporated as a nonprofit organization, and which has been regularly and actively fulfilling its primary purpose within this state during the two immediately preceding years. However, an educational organization does not need to be incorporated or be in existence for two years. An organization’s primary purpose may not involve the conduct of games. The organization may be issued a license by the attorney general. For purposes of this section, a foreign corporation authorized under chapter 10-33 is not an eligible organization unless authorized to conduct a raffle under chapter 20.1-04 or 20.1-08 and may not conduct a game other than a raffle under chapter 20.1-04 or 20.1-08.

“Fraternal organization” means an organization, except a school fraternity, which is a branch, lodge, or chapter of a national or state organization and exists for the common business, brotherhood, or other interests of its members. The organization must have qualified for exemption from federal income tax under section 501(c)(8) or 501(c)(10) of the Internal Revenue Code.

“Games” means games of chance.

“Gross proceeds” means all cash and checks received from conducting games.

“Licensed organization” means an eligible organization licensed by the attorney general.

“Manufacturer” means, for a pull tab or bingo card, a person who designs, prints, assembles, or produces the product. For a pull tab dispensing device, bingo card marking device, or a fifty-fifty raffle system, a manufacturer means the person who directly controls and manages development of and owns the rights to the proprietary software encoded on a processing chip that enables the device to operate.

“Net income” means gross proceeds less cash prizes, cost of merchandise prizes, and expenses to conduct the gaming activity.

“Net proceeds” means adjusted gross proceeds less allowable expenses and gaming tax.

“Permit” means a local permit or restricted event permit issued by a governing body of a city or county to a nonprofit organization or group of people domiciled in North Dakota.

“Person” means any person, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, or organization.

“Prize board” means a board used with pull tabs to award cash or merchandise prizes.

“Public safety organization” means an organization whose primary purpose is to provide firefighting, ambulance service, crime prevention, or similar emergency assistance.

“Public-spirited organization” means an organization whose primary purpose is for scientific research, amateur sports competition, safety, literary, arts, preservation of cultural heritage, educational activities, educational public service, youth, economic development, tourism, community medical care, community recreation, or similar organization, which does not meet the definition of any other type of eligible organization. However, a nonprofit organization or a group of people recognized as a public-spirited organization by a governing body of a city or county for obtaining a permit does not need to meet this definition.

“Pull tab” means a folded or banded ticket or jar ticket, a pull tab card with break-open tabs, or an electronic pull tab displaying concealed numbers or symbols or combinations of concealed numbers and symbols which are exposed by a player to determine the outcome. The terms “pull tab” and “jar ticket” are used interchangeably unless otherwise stated. A winning pull tab contains certain symbols, numbers, or combinations of symbols and numbers and may contain multiple winning symbols, numbers, or combinations of symbols and numbers which have been previously designated as winning symbols or numbers.

“Religious organization” means a church, body of communicants, or group gathered in common membership whose primary purpose is for advancement of religion, mutual support and edification in piety, worship, and religious observances.

“Veterans organization” means any congressionally chartered post organization, or any branch or lodge or chapter of a nonprofit national or state organization whose membership consists of individuals who are or were members of the armed services or forces of the United States. The organization must have qualified for exemption from federal income tax under section 501(c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 514, § 1; 1983, ch. 546, §§ 2, 3; 1985, ch. 549, § 1; 1987, ch. 608, § 1; 1987, ch. 609, § 1; 1987, ch. 610, § 1; 1989, ch. 612, § 1; 1991, ch. 28, § 20; 1991, ch. 545, § 1; 1991, ch. 546, § 1; 1991, ch. 547, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1993, ch. 499, § 1; 1995, ch. 484, § 1; 1997, ch. 428, § 3; 1997, ch. 429, § 1; 1999, ch. 441, § 1; 2001, ch. 460, § 3; 2003, ch. 449, § 1; 2003, ch. 450, § 1; 2007, ch. 446, § 1; 2009, ch. 450, § 1; 2009, ch. 451, § 1; 2011, ch. 379, § 1; 2011, ch. 378, § 1; 2017, ch. 359, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 360, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 427, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 379, S.L. 2011 became effective August 1, 2011.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 378, S.L. 2011 became effective July 1, 2011.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 450, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2009.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 451, S.L. 2009 became effective August 1, 2009.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 446, S.L. 2007 became effective July 1, 2007.

Note.

Section 53-06.1-01 was amended 2 times by the 2017 Legislative Assembly.

Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 359, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1216; and Section 1 of Chapter 360, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 1415.

Collateral References.

Validity of statute or ordinance prohibiting or regulating bookmaking or pool selling, 80 A.L.R.4th 1079.

Validity, construction, and application of statute or ordinance prohibiting or regulating use or occupancy of premises for bookmaking or pool selling, 82 A.L.R.4th 356.

Construction and application of statute or ordinance prohibiting or regulating bookmaking or pool selling, 84 A.L.R.4th 740.

53-06.1-01.1.
Gaming commission.

The state gaming commission consists of the chairman and four other members appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate. The members serve three-year terms and until a successor is appointed and qualified. If the senate is not in session when the term of a member expires, the governor may make an interim appointment, and the interim appointee holds office until the senate confirms or rejects the appointment. A member appointed to fill a vacancy arising from other than the natural expiration of a term serves only for the unexpired portion of the term. The terms of the commissioners must be staggered so no more than two terms expire each July first.

A person is ineligible for appointment to the commission if that person has not been a resident of this state for at least two years before the date of appointment. A person is also ineligible if that person is not of such character and reputation as to promote public confidence in the administration of gaming in this state. A person is also ineligible if that person has been convicted of a felony criminal offense or has pled guilty or been found guilty of any violation of chapter 12.1-06, 12.1-08, 12.1-09, 12.1-10, 12.1-11, 12.1-12, 12.1-22, 12.1-23, 12.1-24, 12.1-28, 53-06.1, or 53-06.2, or has pled guilty or been found guilty of any violation of section 6-08-16 or 6-08-16.2, or has pled guilty or been found guilty of any offense or violation that has a direct bearing on the person’s fitness to be involved in gaming, or who has committed an equivalent offense or violation of the laws of another state or of the United States. A person who has a financial interest in gaming or is an employee or a member of the gaming committee of a licensed organization or distributor cannot be a member of the commission. For the purpose of this subsection, a financial interest includes the receiving of any direct payment from an eligible organization for property, services, or facilities provided to that organization.

Commission members are entitled to seventy-five dollars per day for compensation for each day spent on commission duties and mileage and expense reimbursement as allowed to other state employees.

The commission shall adopt rules in accordance with chapter 28-32, to administer and regulate the gaming industry, including methods of conduct, play, and promotion of games; minimum procedures and standards for recordkeeping and internal control; requiring tax returns and reports from organizations or distributors; methods of competition and doing business by distributors and manufacturers; acquisition and use of gaming equipment; quality standards or specifications for the manufacture of pull tabs, paper bingo cards, electronic pull tab devices, pull tab dispensing devices, bingo card marking devices, and fifty-fifty raffle systems; to ensure that net proceeds are used for educational, charitable, patriotic, fraternal, religious, or public-spirited uses; to protect and promote the public interest; to ensure fair and honest games; to ensure that fees and taxes are paid; and to prevent and detect unlawful gambling activity.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 28, § 21; 1993, ch. 499, § 2; 1993, ch. 500, § 1; 1995, ch. 484, § 2; 1997, ch. 428, § 4; 1999, ch. 441, § 2; 2001, ch. 460, § 4; 2003, ch. 449, § 2; 2017, ch. 359, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 360, §§
2, 3, effective August 1, 2017.

Note.

Section 53-06.1-01.1 was amended 2 times by the 2017 Legislative Assembly.

Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 2 of Chapter 359, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1216; and Section 2 of Chapter 360, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 1415.

53-06.1-01.2.
Duty of attorney general to participate in certain hearings — Employment of private counsel by commission. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 428, § 21.

53-06.1-02.
Organizations eligible — Use of net proceeds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 428, § 21.

53-06.1-02.1.
Waiver of two-year active requirement — Local permit. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 484, § 35.

53-06.1-03.
Permits, site authorization, and licenses.

Except as authorized by the attorney general, an organization that has its license suspended or revoked, or has relinquished or not renewed its license and not disbursed its net proceeds, is ineligible for a license or permit. Only one of two or more closely related organizations may have a license or permit at one time. A college or university fraternity, sorority, or club is not closely related to an educational organization. An organization shall apply for a permit as follows:

An organization recognized as a public-spirited organization by the governing body of a city or county may apply for permits. A local permit may allow the organization to conduct only raffles, bingo, or sports pools. A restricted event permit may allow the organization to conduct only raffles, bingo, sports pools, paddlewheels, twenty-one, and poker. The organization or closely related organizations as a whole may only award a primary prize that does not exceed eight thousand dollars and total prizes of all games do not exceed forty thousand dollars per year. These maximum prize amounts do not apply to raffles conducted under chapter 20.1-08. The determination of what is a “public-spirited organization” is within the sole discretion of the governing body. An organization shall disclose on the application its intended use of the net income from the gaming activity. A governing body may issue a permit for games to be held at designated times and places.

An organization shall apply to the governing body of the city or county in which the proposed site is located. Application must be made on a form prescribed by the attorney general. Approval may be granted at the discretion of the governing body. A governing body may establish a fee not to exceed twenty-five dollars for each permit. A permit must be on a fiscal year basis from July first to June thirtieth or on a calendar-year basis.

An organization that has a local permit or a restricted event permit may use the net income from the gaming activity for any purpose that does not violate this chapter or gaming rules, unless the organization is a state political party or legislative district party committee, the organization may use the net income from a raffle for a political purpose. For purposes of this subdivision, a public-spirited use includes a political purpose.

An organization that has a restricted event permit is restricted to one event per year and:

May not pay remuneration to employees for personal services;

Shall use chips as wagers;

Shall redeem a player’s chips for merchandise prizes or cash;

Shall disburse net income to eligible uses referenced in subdivision c, if applicable, and in section 53-06.1-11.1; and

Shall file a report prescribed by the attorney general with the governing body and attorney general.

An eligible organization shall apply for a license to conduct only bingo, electronic quick shot bingo, raffles, calcuttas, pull tabs, punchboards, twenty-one, paddlewheels, poker, or sports pools by:

First securing approval for a site authorization from the governing body of the city or county in which the proposed site is located. Approval, which may be granted at the discretion of the governing body, must be recorded on a site authorization form that is to accompany the license application to the attorney general for final approval. A governing body may not require an eligible organization to donate net proceeds to the city, county, or related political subdivision or for community programs or services within the city or county as a condition for receiving a site authorization from the city or county. A governing body may limit the number of tables for the game of twenty-one per site and the number of sites upon which a licensed organization may conduct games within the city or county. A governing body may charge a one hundred dollar fee for a site authorization; and

Annually applying for a license from the attorney general before July first on a form prescribed by the attorney general and remitting a one hundred fifty dollar license fee for each city or county that approves a site authorization. However, the attorney general may allow an organization that only conducts a raffle or calcutta in two or more cities or counties to annually apply for a consolidated license and remit a one hundred fifty dollar license fee for each city or county in which a site is located. An organization shall document that it qualifies as an eligible organization. If an organization amends its primary purpose as stated in its articles of incorporation or materially changes its basic character, the organization shall reapply for licensure.

A licensed organization or organization that has a permit shall conduct games as follows:

Only one licensed organization or organization that has a permit may conduct games at an authorized site on a day, except that a raffle may be conducted for a special occasion by another licensed organization or organization that has a permit when one of these conditions is met:

When the area for the raffle is physically separated from the area where games are conducted by the regular organization.

Upon request of the regular organization and with the approval of the alcoholic beverage establishment, the regular organization’s license or permit is suspended for that specific time of day by the attorney general.

Except for a temporary site authorized for fourteen or fewer consecutive days for not more than two events per quarter, a licensed organization may not have more than twenty-five sites unless granted a waiver by the attorney general. If the attorney general finds that there is no other licensed organization interested in conducting gaming at a site for which a waiver is being sought, the attorney general may approve the waiver for no more than five sites.

Games of electronic quick shot bingo, pull tabs, punchboards, twenty-one, paddlewheels, poker, and sports pools may be conducted only during the hours when alcoholic beverages may be dispensed according to applicable regulations of the state, county, or city.

An organization may not permit a person under twenty-one years of age to directly or indirectly play pull tabs, punchboards, twenty-one, calcuttas, sports pools, paddlewheels, or poker. An organization may not permit an individual under eighteen years of age to directly or indirectly play electronic quick shot bingo. An organization may not permit an individual under eighteen years of age to directly or indirectly play bingo unless the individual is accompanied by an adult, bingo is conducted by an organization that has a permit, or the game’s prize structure does not exceed that allowed for a permit.

A permit, or site authorization and license, must be displayed at a site.

The attorney general may issue a conditional license to an eligible organization whose regularly issued license has expired or been suspended, revoked, or relinquished. The attorney general shall designate the time period for which the conditional license is valid and may impose any conditions.

A governing body or local law enforcement official may inspect a site’s gaming equipment and examine or cause to be examined any gaming-related books and records of a licensed organization or organization that has a permit.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 514, § 3; 1983, ch. 546, § 4; 1985, ch. 550, § 1; 1985, ch. 551, §§ 1, 2; 1985, ch. 552, § 1; 1987, ch. 532, § 4; 1987, ch. 611, § 1; 1987, ch. 612, § 1; 1989, ch. 612, § 3; 1989, ch. 615, § 1; 1989, ch. 616, § 1; 1989, ch. 617, § 1; 1989, ch. 618, § 1; 1989, ch. 619, § 1; 1991, ch. 28, § 22; 1991, ch. 548, § 1; 1991, ch. 549, § 1; 1993, ch. 499, § 6; 1995, ch. 484, § 4; 1995, ch. 485, § 1; 1997, ch. 428, § 5; 1999, ch. 441, § 3; 2001, ch. 460, § 5; 2001, ch. 461, § 1; 2003, ch. 449, § 3; 2009, ch. 451, § 2; 2009, ch. 452, § 1; 2015, ch. 356, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 360, § 4, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 427, §§ 2, 3, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 386, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 356, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 451, S.L. 2009 became effective August 1, 2009.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 452, S.L. 2009 became effective August 1, 2009.

53-06.1-03.1.
Bingo sites — Limit on rent. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 428, § 21.

53-06.1-03.2.
Twenty-one sites — Limit on rent. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 428, § 21.

53-06.1-03.3.
Pull tab sites — Limit on rent. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 428, § 21.

53-06.1-03.4.
Electronic video gaming devices — Limit on rent. [Repealed]

Disapproved by R.M. December 5, 1989, S.L. 1991, ch. 744.

53-06.1-04.
College fraternities and sororities allowed to conduct raffles, sports pools, and bingo — Use of proceeds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 484, § 35.

53-06.1-05.
Local permit for educational organizations, college fraternities, and sororities for raffles, sports pools, and bingo. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 484, § 35.

53-06.1-05.1.
Regulation by city or county of number of twenty-one tables per site and number of sites per licensed organization. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 428, § 21.

53-06.1-06.
Persons permitted to conduct games — Equipment.

No person, except a member, volunteer, an employee of a licensed organization or an organization that has a permit, or an employee of a temporary employment agency who provides services to a licensed organization, may manage, control, or conduct any game. “Member” includes a member of an auxiliary organization. In conducting pull tabs or prize boards through a dispensing device, selling pull tabs through a pull-tab device, selling raffle tickets, or conducting sports pools, the attorney general may allow an employee of an alcoholic beverage establishment to provide limited assistance to an organization.

Except when authorized by the attorney general or allowed by the gaming rules, an eligible organization shall procure gaming equipment only from a licensed distributor. No equipment or prizes may be purchased at an excessive price.

An organization and distributor shall maintain complete, accurate, and legible bank and accounting records in North Dakota for all gaming activity and establish a system of internal control as prescribed by rule. The governing board of an eligible organization is primarily responsible and may be held accountable for the proper determination and use of net proceeds. If an organization does not renew its license or its license is denied, relinquished, or revoked and it has not disbursed all of its net proceeds, the organization shall file an action plan as prescribed by the gaming rules with the attorney general.

The value of a merchandise prize awarded in a game is its retail price, excluding sales tax.

A person is restricted from being involved in gaming and the attorney general shall conduct a criminal history record check as follows:

A person who has pled guilty to or been found guilty of a felony offense as defined by the laws of this state, other states, or the federal government, or has pled guilty to or been found guilty of a violation of this chapter, a gaming rule, chapter 12.1-28 or 53-06.2, or offenses of other states or the federal government equivalent to offenses defined in these chapters, regardless of whether the person has completed or received a deferred imposition of sentence or suspended sentence, may not be a licensed distributor, be an investor in or board member or consultant to a licensed distributor, or be employed by a licensed distributor, and may not be employed by a licensed organization to conduct games, for five years from the date of conviction, release from incarceration, or expiration of parole or probation, whichever is the latest.

Paragraph 1 does not apply if the offense to which the person pled guilty or has been found guilty is a misdemeanor and the person has received a deferred imposition of sentence and has fully complied with the terms of the deferral.

A person who has pled guilty to or been found guilty of a misdemeanor offense in violation of section 6-08-16.1 or chapter 12.1-06, 12.1-23, or 12.1-24 or offenses of other states, the federal government, or a municipality equivalent to these offenses, regardless if the person has completed or received a suspended sentence, may not be a licensed distributor or be employed by a licensed distributor, and may not be employed by a licensed organization to conduct games, for two years from the date of conviction, release from incarceration, or expiration of parole or probation, whichever is the latest, unless the person has received a deferred imposition of sentence and has fully complied with the terms of the deferral.

Unless an employee is exempt by the gaming rules or attorney general, the attorney general shall conduct a criminal history record check of each employee of a licensed organization or distributor and charge a fee prescribed by section 12-60-16.9. The fee may be waived by the attorney general if a federal agency or local law enforcement agency has done a record check. The attorney general may require advance payment of any additional fee necessary to pay the cost of a record check of a person for whom adequate background information sources are not readily available. The advance payment must be placed in the attorney general’s refund fund. The unused funds must be returned to the person within thirty days of the conclusion of the record check. Unless a federal or local law enforcement agency conducts the record check, the attorney general shall notify the organization or distributor of the result. The attorney general shall keep the information confidential except in the proper administration of this chapter or any gaming rule or to provide to an authorized law enforcement agency.

For a site where bingo is the primary game or a site that is leased by a licensed organization, the organization may not pay bingo prizes in which the total bingo prizes exceed total bingo gross proceeds for a period prescribed by gaming rule. However, if bingo is the primary game at the site, a bingo prize that equals or exceeds ten thousand dollars is excluded from the total of the bingo prizes.

A city or county may require a person conducting games to obtain a local work permit, charge a reasonable fee, and conduct a criminal history record check.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 514, § 6; 1983, ch. 546, §§ 8, 9; 1987, ch. 613, § 1; 1989, ch. 612, § 9; 1989, ch. 615, § 3; 1991, ch. 28, § 23; 1991, ch. 54, § 27; 1991, ch. 545, § 2; 1991, ch. 549, § 4; 1991, ch. 550, § 1; 1993, ch. 499, § 10; 1995, ch. 484, § 9; 1995, ch. 485, § 2; 1997, ch. 428, § 6; 1999, ch. 441, § 4; 2001, ch. 460, § 6; 2003, ch. 449, § 4; 2003, ch. 450, § 2; 2005, ch. 465, § 1; 2017, ch. 359, § 3, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 360, § 5, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 54, § 9, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 175, § 6, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 53-06.1-06 was amended 2 times by the Legislative Assembly.

Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 3 of Chapter 359, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1216; and Section 5 of Chapter 360, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 1415.

53-06.1-06.1.
Local work permits. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 428, § 21.

53-06.1-07.
Games allowed. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 428, § 21.

53-06.1-07.1.
Limitations on hours and participation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 428, § 21.

53-06.1-07.2.
Poker.

Poker may be conducted on not more than two occasions per year. An organization may supply the dealer. The maximum single bet is one dollar. Not more than three raises, of not more than one dollar each, may be made among all the players in each round of bets. For nontournament activity, an organization shall charge each player a fee not to exceed two dollars per one-half hour of playing time, collected in advance. For a tournament, an organization shall charge each player an entry fee and the amount of prizes may not exceed ninety percent of the gross proceeds.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 608, § 3; 1989, ch. 615, § 5; 1991, ch. 545, § 4; 1993, ch. 499, § 13; 1995, ch. 484, § 13; 1997, ch. 428, § 7; 1999, ch. 441, § 5; 2001, ch. 460, § 7; 2003, ch. 449, § 5.

53-06.1-07.3.
Calcuttas.

A calcutta may only be conducted for a professional or amateur sporting event held in this state but not for elementary, secondary, or postsecondary education sports events. Only one wager per competitor may be allowed in a calcutta pool. The amount of prizes may not exceed ninety percent of the gross proceeds. A player may not place a wager on a competitor in a calcutta sporting event unless the competitor is eighteen years of age or older.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 620, § 3; 1993, ch. 499, § 14; 1995, ch. 484, § 14; 1997, ch. 428, § 8; 1999, ch. 441, § 6.

53-06.1-07.4.
Paddlewheels.

A paddlewheel is a mechanical vertical wheel marked off into equally spaced sections that contain numbers or symbols, and which after being spun, uses a pointer to indicate the winning number or symbol. The maximum price per paddlewheel ticket or chip is two dollars. A table and chips must be used to register a player’s wager when a prize is a variable multiple of the wager. Otherwise, a ticket must be used. A player may not place wagers totaling more than twenty dollars on each spin of the paddlewheel. Cash, chips, or merchandise prizes may be awarded. No single cash prize, value of chips, or the retail value of the merchandise prize to be awarded for a winning ticket or chip may exceed one hundred dollars.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 552, § 1; 1993, ch. 499, § 15; 1997, ch. 428, § 9; 1999, ch. 441, § 7; 2001, ch. 460, § 8.

53-06.1-08.
Punchboards and pull tabs.

Unless all top tier winning pull tabs or punchboard punches of a game have been redeemed, or unless otherwise permitted by a gaming rule or the attorney general, a person or organization may not close the game after it has been placed in play. The maximum sales price per pull tab and punchboard punch is two dollars. The maximum prize value of a top tier winning pull tab or punchboard punch is five hundred dollars. The game of pull tabs may only be conducted by commingling deals.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 514, § 8; 1983, ch. 546, § 10; 1987, ch. 609, § 2; 1987, ch. 614, § 1; 1989, ch. 612, § 12; 1993, ch. 499, § 16; 1995, ch. 484, § 15; 1997, ch. 428, § 10.

53-06.1-08.1.
Limitation on pull tab prizes. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 484, § 35.

53-06.1-08.2.
Electronic pull tab device requirements.

An electronic pull tab device must display an electronic pull tab in which the player may win credits that can be redeemed for cash or used to purchase more pull tabs. The device may not directly dispense coins, cash, tokens, or anything else of value other than a credit ticket voucher.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 3, § 12, effective July 1, 2017.

53-06.1-09.
Sports pools.

A sports pool must be for a professional sport only. The maximum wager is twenty-five dollars. The amount of prizes may not exceed ninety percent of the gross proceeds.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 514, § 9; 1985, ch. 553, § 1; 1993, ch. 499, § 18; 1995, ch. 484, § 16; 1997, ch. 428, § 11; 2015, ch. 357, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 357, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

53-06.1-10.
Twenty-one.

The organization shall provide playing chips of various denominations to players although the organization may use a metal coin rather than a fifty-cent chip. The organization may set the minimum limit for the original wager at not more than three dollars on one active table. If there is more than one active table at a site, the organization may set a higher minimum wager on additional tables. The maximum limit per wager may be set by the organization at not more than twenty-five dollars. Wagers in increments of one dollar must be accepted between the posted minimum and the posted maximum limit. A player may not play more than two hands at the same time. Only the player actually playing a hand may place a wager on that hand. Each player plays the player’s hand against the dealer’s hand. Any requirement to pool tips is within the sole discretion of each organization. Except for a site that has twenty-one gross proceeds averaging less than ten thousand dollars per quarter, an organization may not conduct twenty-one at the site with wagers exceeding two dollars unless the organization has first installed video surveillance equipment as required by rules and the equipment is approved by the attorney general.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 514, § 10; 1983, ch. 546, § 11; 1989, ch. 612, § 14; 1989, ch. 622, § 1; 1991, ch. 553, § 1; 1993, ch. 499, § 19; 1995, ch. 484, § 17; 1997, ch. 428, § 12; 1999, ch. 441, § 8; 2001, ch. 460, § 9; 2001, ch. 462, § 1; 2003, ch. 449, § 6; 2015, ch. 358, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 358, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

53-06.1-10.1.
Raffles.

A prize for a raffle may be cash or merchandise but may not be real estate. No single cash prize may exceed twenty-five thousand dollars and the total cash prizes in one day may not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars. However, on not more than two occasions per year a licensed organization may, at the request of a winning player, exchange a merchandise prize valued at not more than twenty-five thousand dollars for a cash prize.

The maximum cash prize limits of this section do not apply to a public-spirited organization that supports amateur collegiate athletics.

An organization permitted to conduct raffles in this state may conduct a fifty-fifty raffle either by manual drawing or by using a random number generator. Fifty-fifty raffle tickets must be sold and drawings held onsite at the location of and on the date of the event. Fifty-fifty raffles may not be conducted online over the internet.

A licensed organization permitted to conduct raffles in this state may sell online over the internet and may accept an electronic payment, including payment by a debit card or a credit card, for the purchase of a raffle ticket. An organization that accepts payment by credit card for the purchase of a raffle ticket shall limit an individual’s ticket purchases using a credit card to five hundred dollars per day, not to exceed one thousand five hundred dollars per week. If a licensed organization accepts electronic payment for the purchase of a raffle ticket, the organization shall verify the ticket purchaser is at least eighteen years of age and physically is located in the state.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 546, § 12; 1989, ch. 623, § 1; 1993, ch. 499, § 20; 1995, ch. 484, § 18; 1997, ch. 428, § 13; 2005, ch. 465, § 2; 2007, ch. 447, § 1; 2013, ch. 395, § 1; 2015, ch. 356, § 2, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 361, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 387, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 356, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 395, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 447, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

53-06.1-10.2.
Electronic quick shot bingo.

Electronic quick shot bingo is a bingo game played on portable hand-held bingo devices utilizing electronic bingo card images. The maximum sales price per electronic bingo card is five dollars. The bingo game is played using twenty-four predrawn letters and numbers and may use up to six bonus letters and numbers to achieve predetermined patterns. The letters and numbers may only be drawn by the organization either manually or with the use of a random number generator, once during a business day and before the beginning of any session. It is not required for each bingo game to have a winner. The bingo devices used in conjunction with a site operating system automatically daubs the called letters and numbers via a radio frequency signal or wi-fi transmission on a maximum of sixteen electronic bingo cards for an individual game. The site operating system, including the point-of-sale, allows an employee to deposit credits received from a player by cash, check, or debit card to a temporary credit account to be used by a player for the purchase of electronic bingo cards. The devices may determine a winning bingo and must accumulate the winning prize amounts in a separate winnings account which may only be redeemed by an employee.

An electronic quick shot bingo marking device under subsection 1 is not a “coin-operated gaming device” as defined in subsection 4 of section 12.1-28-02.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 361, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 360, § 6, effective August 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2015.